Oklahoma, session 2026, SB838.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 203 of Title 75A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Social media platform” means a website or internet medium


that:


a. permits a person to become a registered user,


establish an account, or create a profile for the


purpose of allowing users to create, share, and view


user-generated content through such an account or


profile,

Req. No. 257 Page 1


b. enables one or more users to generate content that can


be viewed by other users of the medium, and


c. primarily serves as a medium for users to interact


with content generated by other users of the medium;


and


2. “User” means a person who accesses or uses a social media


platform.


B. 1. A social media platform shall not permit an individual


under sixteen (16) years of age to create or maintain an account or


profile on such platform.


2. A social media platform shall perform reasonable age


verification methods to verify the age of each user pursuant to the


provisions of this section.


3. Any account and data of a user determined to be under


sixteen (16) years of age that is created before the effective date


of this act shall be deleted and removed from the platform.


Social media platforms shall have six (6) months after the effective


date of this act to carry out the provisions of this subsection.


C. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a text


messaging platform or a platform for which the primary purpose is


related to education or health care.


D. The Attorney General is authorized to bring a civil action


against a social media platform for a violation of the provisions of



Req. No. 257 Page 2


this section and to seek injunctive relief or other appropriate


relief as determined by the court.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-257 CN 1/19/2025 5:44:23 AM







































Req. No. 257 Page 3